South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S914.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 7-13-740 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 7-13-740.  There must be provided at each polling precinct at least one bootha sufficient number of booths in which a voter may prepare his ballot in secret.  At least one booth must be provided for each two hundred and fifty registered electors or a major fraction thereof of the precinct.Subject to any guidance, rules, or regulations issued by the State Election Commission, the number of booths provided at each precinct shall be determined by the respective election board or commission conducting the election, taking into consideration the number of registered electors in the precinct and the physical dimensions and configuration of the precinct, among other things.  The booths must be made of wood, sheet metal, or other suitable substance;  must not be less than thirty-two inches wide, thirty-two inches deep, and six feet six inches high;  must have a curtain hanging from the top in front to within three feet of the floor;  and must have a suitable shelf on which the voter can prepare his ballot.  In primary, general, and special elections, the booths must be provided by the board of voter registration and elections.  Only one voter shall be allowed to enter a booth at a time, and no one except as provided herein is allowed to speak to a voter while in the booth preparing his ballot. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----